District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05d

Criminal penalties.

A person who willfully or recklessly violates this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $25,000 per offense per day, imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both. The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by section 101 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Amendment Act of 2012, approved June 11, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-317; D.C. Official Code § 22-3571.01).§  22–3571.01.

History

Mary. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5d
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767